Washington statutes.
RCW 4.92.120

Tortious conduct of state—Assignment of claims.

Claims against the state arising out of tortious conduct may be assigned voluntarily, involuntarily, and by operation of law to the same extent as like claims against private persons may be so assigned.

[ 1963 c 159 s 5.]